California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(d) (1) The last known address of an apparent owner, for the purpose of determining the jurisdiction over property subject to escheat pursuant to this section, is either of the following:

(A) The address used for purposes of delivering first-class United States mail.

(B) Any description, code, or other
 indication of the location of the apparent owner that identifies the state of last known address, even if the description, code, or indication of the location is not sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States Postal Service mail to the apparent owner.

(2) If there is a conflict between the address identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) and any description, code, or other indication identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the address identified in subparagraph (A) shall be deemed as the last known address of the apparent owner.

(e) If the business association has a mailing address for the apparent owner of a digital financial asset in its records, which is not known to be inaccurate, the business association shall send a notice to the owner via certified mail, return receipt requested.

(f) If the business association does not have a mailing address for the apparent owner of a digital financial asset in its records, and the apparent owner has consented to electronic service, the notice may be sent electronically.

(g) Notice pursuant to this subdivision shall be sent not less than 6 nor more than 12 months before the time the digital financial asset becomes reportable to the Controller under this chapter.

(1) The notice shall state at the top of the communication: “THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA REQUIRES US TO NOTIFY YOU THAT YOUR UNCLAIMED PROPERTY MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE IF YOU DO NOT CONTACT US,” or substantially similar language.

(2) The notice shall specify the time when the digital financial asset will escheat and the effects of escheat, including the need to file a claim for the
 return of the digital financial asset.

(3) The notice shall do all of the following, in boldface type or in a font a minimum of two points larger than the rest of the notice, exclusive of the heading:

(A) Specify that since the date of last interest, or for the last two years, there has been no indication of owner interest in the digital financial asset.

(B) Identify the digital financial asset by number or identifier, which need not exceed four digits.

(C) Indicate that the digital financial asset is in danger of escheating to the state.

(D) Specify that the Unclaimed Property Law requires business associations to transfer a digital financial asset if it has been unclaimed for three
 years.

(4) The notice shall include a form, prescribed by the Controller, by which the owner may confirm the owner’s current address. If that form is completed, signed by the owner, and returned to the holder of the digital financial asset, or other device in which the owner’s property is being held, it is no longer considered inactive and the escheat period restarts. In lieu of returning the form, the holder may provide a telephone number or electronic means to enable the owner to contact the holder. If a holder is contacted by a presumed owner by telephone or electronic means, the holder shall document that contact in a memorandum which the holder is required to keep on file. That contact serves to indicate owner interest in the digital financial asset and restarts the escheat period.

(h) In addition to the notice required pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), the holder may give
 additional notice at any time between the date of last owner interest and the date the holder transfers the digital financial asset to the Controller.

(i) The holder of any partial key to any digital financial asset that is subject to Section 1516.5 shall attempt to obtain the minimum number of keys required to transfer the digital financial assets within 60 days of determination that the digital financial assets are eligible for escheatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1517.

(a) All property distributable in the course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution or liquidation of a business association that is unclaimed by the owner within six months after the date of final distribution or liquidation escheats to this state.

(b) All property distributable in the course of voluntary or involuntary dissolution or liquidation of an insurer or other person brought under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of
the Insurance Code, that is unclaimed by the owner after six months of the date of final distribution, shall be transferred to the Department of Insurance, with any proceeds of sale of property and other funds to be deposited in the Insurance Fund for expenditure as provided in Section 12937 of the Insurance Code.

(c) This section applies to all tangible personal property located in this state and, subject to Section 1510, to all intangible personal property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   Effective July 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1518.

(a) (1) All tangible personal property located in this state and, subject to Section 1510, all intangible personal property, including intangible personal property maintained in a deposit or account, and the income or increment on such tangible or intangible property, held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person escheats to this state if for more than three years
after it becomes payable or distributable, the owner has not done any of the following:

(A) Increased or decreased the principal.

 (B) Accepted payment of principal or income.

 (C) Corresponded in writing concerning the property.

(D) Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the fiduciary.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), tangible or intangible property, and the income or increment on the tangible or intangible property, held in a fiduciary capacity for another person shall not escheat to the state if the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) are satisfied.

(A) During the previous three years, the fiduciary took one of the following actions:

(i) Held another deposit or account for the benefit of the owner.

(ii) Maintained a deposit or account on behalf of the owner in an individual retirement account.

(iii) Held funds or other property under a retirement plan for a self-employed individual, or similar account or plan, established pursuant to the internal revenue laws of the United States or the laws of this state.

(B) During the previous three years, the owner has done any of the acts described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1) with respect to the deposit, account, or plan described in subparagraph (A), and the fiduciary has communicated electronically or in writing with
the owner at the address to which communications regarding that deposit, account, or plan are regularly sent, with regard to the deposit, account, or plan that would otherwise escheat under this subdivision. “Communications,” for purposes of this subparagraph, includes account statements or statements required under the internal revenue laws of the United States.

(b) Funds in an individual retirement account or a retirement plan for self-employed individuals or similar account or plan established pursuant to the internal revenue laws of the United States or of this state are not payable or distributable within the meaning of subdivision (a) unless either of the following is true:

(1) Under the terms of the account or plan, distribution of all or part of the funds would then be mandatory.

(2) For an account or plan
not subject to mandatory distribution requirement under the internal revenue laws of the United States or the laws of this state, the owner has attained 7012 years of age.

(c) For the purpose of this section, when a person holds property as an agent for a business association, he or she is deemed to hold the property in a fiduciary capacity for the business association alone, unless the agreement between him or her and the business association clearly provides the contrary. For the purposes of this chapter, if a person holds property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone, he or she is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned and the association is deemed to be the holder of the property insofar as the interest of any other person in the property is
concerned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 305, Sec. 5.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1518.5.

(a) Subject to Section 1510, funds maintained in a preneed funeral trust or similar account or plan escheat to the state if, for more than three years after the funds became payable and distributable pursuant to subdivision (b), as established from the records of the funeral establishment or trustee, the beneficiary or trustor has not corresponded electronically or in writing concerning the property or otherwise indicated an interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the funeral establishment or trustee.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the corpus of a preneed funeral trust or similar account or plan, together with any income accrued, less a revocation fee not to exceed the amount reserved pursuant to Section 7735
 of the Business and Professions Code, becomes payable and distributable under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The beneficiary of the trust attained, or would have attained if living, 105 years of age.

(2) Forty-five years have passed since execution of the preneed funeral agreement.

(3) The holder received notification of the death or presumed death of the beneficiary and has not provided the contracted funeral merchandise or services.

(4) The preneed funeral trust is a preneed installment trust and the amount due to the funeral establishment from the trustor has not been paid during the three preceding years and neither the trustor nor the beneficiary has communicated with either the funeral establishment or the trustee about the preneed
 funeral installment trust during that three-year period.

(c) For purposes of this section, except subdivision (d), the funeral establishment obligated to provide preneed funeral services under the trust or similar account or plan is the holder. For purposes of subdivision (d), the trustee is the holder.

(d) (1) All funds, including accrued income and revocation fees reserved pursuant to Section 7735 of the Business and Professions Code, maintained in a preneed funeral trust or similar account or plan held by a trustee for a funeral establishment that has been dissolved, closed, or had its license revoked shall escheat to the state if unclaimed by the funeral establishment, beneficiary, trustor, or legal representative of either the beneficiary or trustor within six months after the date of final distribution or liquidation.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the revocation fee pursuant to Section 7735 of the Business and Professions Code shall not be retained by the funeral establishment.

(e) Escheatment of preneed funeral trust funds to the Controller shall release the funeral establishment from the obligation of furnishing the personal property, funeral merchandise, or services originally arranged in the preneed funeral agreement associated with the trust. However, if the funeral establishment provided personal property, or funeral merchandise or services to the beneficiary after funds have escheated, the funeral establishment shall be entitled to recover the escheated funds upon submission to the Controller of a death certificate and a statement detailing the personal property or funeral merchandise or services provided pursuant to Section 1560.

(f) Nothing in this section, or any other law or regulation, shall require escheatment of any funds received by a funeral establishment, cemetery, or other person from property or funeral merchandise or services provided under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8600) of Part 3 of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) A trustee or a funeral establishment shall not charge the trust, a trustor, or a beneficiary any fees or costs associated with a search or verification conducted pursuant to this section. However, a trustee or funeral establishment may incorporate fees or costs associated with a search or verification as part of the administration of the trust pursuant to Section 7735 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) Delivery of the corpus of the trust, and the income accrued to the trust, to the funeral establishment, the trustor, the beneficiary, or the
 Controller pursuant to this article shall relieve the trustee of any further liability with regard to those funds.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 514, Sec. 5.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1519.

All tangible personal property located in this state, and, subject to Section 1510, all intangible personal property, held for the owner by any government or governmental subdivision or agency, that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three years escheats to this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 450, Sec. 10.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1519.5.

Subject to Section 1510, any sums held by a business association that have been ordered to be refunded by a court or an administrative agency including, but not limited to, the Public Utilities Commission, which have remained unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after becoming payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund, whether or not the final determination or order requires any person entitled to a refund to make a claim for it, escheats to this state.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply retroactively to all
funds held by business associations on or after January 1, 1977, and which remain undistributed by the business association as of the effective date of this act.

Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this section shall be construed to change the authority of a court or administrative agency to order equitable remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1096, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1520.

(a) All tangible personal property located in this state and, subject to Section 1510, all intangible personal property, except property of the classes mentioned in Sections 1511, 1513, 1514, 1515, 1515.5, 1516, 1516.5, 1517, 1518, 1518.5, 1519, and 1521, including any income or increment thereon and deducting any lawful charges, that is held or owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three years after it became payable or distributable escheats to this state.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1513.5, subdivision (b) of Section 1514, subdivision (d) of Section 1516, and subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1516.5, if the holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner of
 property valued at fifty dollars ($50) or more, which the holder’s records do not disclose to be inaccurate, the holder shall make reasonable efforts to notify the owner by mail or, if the owner has consented to electronic notice, electronically, that the owner’s property will escheat to the state pursuant to this chapter. The notice shall be mailed not less than 6 nor more than 12 months before the time when the owner’s property held by the business becomes reportable to the Controller in accordance with this chapter. The face of the notice shall contain a heading at the top that reads as follows: “THE STATE OF CALIFORNIA REQUIRES US TO NOTIFY YOU THAT YOUR UNCLAIMED PROPERTY MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE IF YOU DO NOT CONTACT US,” or substantially similar language. The notice required by this subdivision shall specify the time when the property will escheat and the effects of escheat, including the need to file a claim in order for the owner’s property to be returned to the owner. The notice required by
 this section shall, in boldface type or in a font a minimum of two points larger than the rest of the notice, exclusive of the heading, (1) specify that since the date of last activity, or for the last two years, there has been no owner activity on the deposit, account, shares, or other interest; (2) identify the deposit, account, shares, or other interest by number or identifier, which need not exceed four digits; (3) indicate that the deposit, account, shares, or other interest is in danger of escheating to the state; and (4) specify that the Unclaimed Property Law requires holders to transfer funds of a deposit, account, shares, or other interest if it has been inactive for three years. It shall also include a form, as prescribed by the Controller, by which the owner may confirm the owner’s current address. If that form is filled out, signed by the owner, and returned to the holder, it shall be deemed that the account, or other device in which the owner’s property is being held, remains currently active
 and recommences the escheat period. In lieu of returning the form, the holder may provide a telephone number or other electronic means to enable the owner to contact the holder. With that contact, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder, the account or other device in which the owner’s property is being held shall be deemed to remain currently active and shall recommence the escheat period. The holder may impose a service charge on the deposit, account, shares, or other interest for this notice in an amount not to exceed the administrative cost of mailing or electronically sending the notice and form, and in no case to exceed two dollars ($2).

(c) In addition to the notice required pursuant to subdivision (b), the holder may give additional notice as described in subdivision (b) at any time between the date of last activity by, or communication with, the owner and the date the holder transfers the property to the
 Controller.

(d) For purposes of this section, “lawful charges” means charges that are specifically authorized by statute, other than the Unclaimed Property Law, or by a valid, enforceable contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 660, Sec. 4.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1520.5.

Section 1520 does not apply to gift certificates subject to Title 1.4A (commencing with Section 1749.45) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. However, Section 1520 applies to any gift certificate that has an expiration date and that is given in exchange for money or any other thing of value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 116, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1521.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), and subject to Section 1510, all employee benefit plan distributions and any income or other increment thereon escheats to the state if the owner has not, within three years after it becomes payable or distributable, accepted the distribution, corresponded in writing concerning the distribution, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the fiduciary of the trust or custodial fund or administrator of the plan under which the trust or fund is established. As used in this section, “fiduciary” means any person
exercising any power, authority, or responsibility of management or disposition with respect to any money or other property of a retirement system or plan, and “administrator” means the person specifically so designated by the plan, trust agreement, contract, or other instrument under which the retirement system or plan is operated, or if none is designated, the employer.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an employee benefit plan distribution and any income or other increment thereon shall not escheat to this state if, at the time the distribution shall become payable to a participant in an employee benefit plan, the plan contains a provision for forfeiture or expressly authorizes the administrator to declare a forfeiture of a distribution to a beneficiary thereof who cannot be found after a period of time specified in the plan, and the trust or fund established under the plan has not terminated prior to the date on which the
distribution would become forfeitable in accordance with the provision.

(c) A participant entitled to an employee benefit plan distribution in the form of residuals shall be relieved from a forfeiture declared under subdivision (b) upon the making of a claim therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 450, Sec. 12.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1522.

No service, handling, maintenance or other charge or fee of any kind which is imposed because of the inactive or unclaimed status contemplated by this chapter, may be deducted or withheld from any property subject to escheat under this chapter, unless specifically permitted by this chapter.

Even when specifically permitted by this chapter, such charges or fees may not be excluded, withheld or deducted from property subject to this chapter if, under its policy or procedure, the holder would not have excluded, withheld or deducted such charges or fees in the event the property had been claimed by the owner prior
to being reported or remitted to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1523.

If an insurer, after a good faith effort to locate and deliver to a policyholder a Proposition 103 rebate ordered or negotiated pursuant to Section 1861.01 of the Insurance Code, determines that a policyholder cannot be located, all funds attributable to that rebate escheat to the state and shall be delivered to the Controller. The funds subject to escheat on or after July 1, 1997, shall be transferred by the Controller to the Department of Insurance for deposit in the Insurance Fund
in the following amounts and for the following purposes:

(a) Up to the amount that will repay principal and interest on the General Fund loan authorized by Item 0845-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 1996 for expenditure as provided in Section 12936 of the Insurance Code.

(b) The sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) for expenditure during the 1998-1999 fiscal year as provided in Section 12967 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 963, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1528.

This chapter does not apply to unclaimed funds held by a life insurance corporation which is organized or admitted as a domestic fraternal benefit society under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10970) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, so long as such funds are used for scholarship funds, exclusive of costs of administration thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Identification of Escheated Property [1530. - 1533.]

1530.

(a) Every person holding funds or other property escheated to this state under this chapter shall report to the Controller as provided in this section.

(b) The report shall be on a form prescribed or approved by the Controller and shall include:

(1) Except with respect to
traveler’s checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of any property of value of at least fifty dollars ($50) escheated under this chapter. This paragraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2014.

(2) Except with respect to traveler’s checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of any property of value of at least twenty-five dollars ($25) escheated under this chapter. This paragraph shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(3) In the case of escheated funds of life insurance corporations, the full name of the insured or annuitant, and his or her last known address, according to the life insurance corporation’s records.

(4) In the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository or in the case of other tangible property, a description of the property and the place where it is held and may be inspected by the Controller. The report shall set forth any amounts owing to the holder for unpaid rent or storage charges and for the cost of opening the safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository, if any, in which the property was contained.

(5) The nature and identifying number, if any, or description of any intangible property and the amount appearing from the records to be due, except that items of value under twenty-five dollars ($25) each may be reported in aggregate.

(6) Except for any property reported in the aggregate, the date when the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the owner with respect to
the property.

(7) Other information which the Controller prescribes by rule as necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(c) If the holder is a successor to other persons who previously held the property for the owner, or if the holder has changed his or her name while holding the property, he or she shall file with his or her report all prior known names and addresses of each holder of the property.

(d) The report shall be filed before November 1 of each year as of June 30 or fiscal yearend next preceding, but the report of life insurance corporations, and the report of all insurance corporation demutualization proceeds subject to Section 1515.5, shall be filed before May 1 of each year as of December 31 next preceding. The initial report for property subject to Section 1515.5 shall be filed on or before May
1, 2004, with respect to conditions in effect on December 31, 2003, and all property shall be determined to be reportable under Section 1515.5 as if that section were in effect on the date of the insurance company demutualization or related reorganization. The Controller may postpone the reporting date upon his or her own motion or upon written request by any person required to file a report.

(e) The report, if made by an individual, shall be verified by the individual; if made by a partnership, by a partner; if made by an unincorporated association or private corporation, by an officer; and if made by a public corporation, by its chief fiscal officer or other employee authorized by the holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 21.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.

(a) Within one year after payment or delivery of escheated property as required by Section 1532, the Controller shall cause a notice to be published in a manner that the Controller determines to be reasonable, which may include, but not be limited to, newspapers, Internet Web sites, radio, television, or other media. In carrying out this duty, the Controller shall not use any of the following:

(1) Money appropriated for the Controller’s audit programs.

(2) More money than the Legislature appropriates for this subdivision’s purpose.

(3) A photograph in a notice.

(4) An elected official’s name in a notice.

(b) Within 165 days after the final date for filing the report required by Section 1530, the Controller shall mail a notice to each person having an address listed in the report who appears to be entitled to property of the value of fifty dollars ($50) or more escheated under this chapter. If the report filed pursuant to Section 1530 includes a social security number, the Controller shall request the Franchise Tax Board to provide a
current address for the apparent owner on the basis of that number. The Controller shall mail the notice to the apparent owner for whom a current address is obtained if the address is different from the address previously reported to the Controller. If the Franchise Tax Board does not provide an address or a different address, then the Controller shall mail the notice to the address listed in the report required by Section 1530.

(c) The mailed notice shall contain all of the following:

(1) A statement that, according to a report filed with the Controller, property is being held to which the addressee appears entitled.

(2) The name and address of the person holding the property and any necessary information regarding changes of name and address of the holder.

(3) A statement that, if satisfactory proof of claim is not presented by the owner to the holder by the date specified in the notice, the property will be placed in the custody of the Controller and may be sold or destroyed pursuant to this chapter, and all further claims concerning the property or, if sold, the net proceeds of its sale, must be directed to the Controller.

(d) This section is intended to inform owners about the possible existence of unclaimed property identified pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 772)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.5.

(a) The Controller shall establish and conduct a notification program designed to inform owners about the possible existence of unclaimed property received pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any notice sent pursuant to this section shall not contain a photograph or likeness of an elected official.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, upon the request of the Controller, a state or local
governmental agency may furnish to the Controller from its records the address or other identification or location information that could reasonably be used to locate an owner of unclaimed property.

(2) If the address or other identification or location information requested by the Controller is deemed confidential under any laws or regulations of this state, it shall nevertheless be furnished to the Controller. However, neither the Controller nor any officer, agent, or employee of the Controller shall use or disclose that information except as may be necessary in attempting to locate the owner of unclaimed property.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to require disclosure of information in violation of federal law.

(4) If a fee or charge is customarily made for the information requested by the Controller,
the Controller shall pay that customary fee or charge.

(d) Costs for administering this section shall be subject to the level of appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 179, Sec. 3.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.6.

(a) In addition to the notices required pursuant to this chapter, the Controller may mail a separate notice to an apparent owner of a United States savings bond, war bond, or military award whose name is shown on or can be associated with the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository and is different from the reported owner of the safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

(b) A notice sent pursuant to this section shall not contain a photograph or likeness of an elected official.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, upon request of the Controller, a state or local governmental agency may furnish to the Controller from its records the address or other identification or location information that could reasonably be used to locate an owner of unclaimed property.

(2) If the address or other identification or location information requested by the Controller is deemed confidential under any law or regulation of the state, it shall nevertheless be furnished to the Controller. However, neither the Controller nor any officer, agent, or employee of the Controller shall use or disclose that information, except as may be necessary in attempting to locate the owner of unclaimed property.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to require disclosure of information in violation of federal law.

(4) If a fee or charge is customarily made for the information requested by the Controller, the Controller shall pay the customary fee or charge.

(d) Costs for administering this section shall be subject to the level of appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   (AB 355)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1532.

(a) Every person filing a report as provided by Section 1530 shall, no sooner than seven months and no later than seven months and 15 days after the final date for filing the report, pay or deliver to the Controller all escheated property specified in the report. Any payment of unclaimed cash in an amount of at least two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be made by electronic funds transfer pursuant to regulations adopted by the Controller. The Controller may postpone the date for payment or delivery of the property, and the date for any report required by subdivision (b), upon the Controller’s own motion or upon written request by any person required to pay or deliver the property or file a report as required by this section.

(b) If a person establishes their right to
 receive any property specified in the report to the satisfaction of the holder before that property has been delivered to the Controller, or it appears that, for any other reason, the property may not be subject to escheat under this chapter, the holder shall not pay or deliver the property to the Controller but shall instead file a report with the Controller, on a form and in a format prescribed or approved by the Controller, containing information pertaining to the property subject to escheat.

(c) Any property not paid or delivered pursuant to subdivision (b) that is later determined by the holder to be subject to escheat under this chapter shall not be subject to the interest provision of Section 1577.

(d) The holder of any interest under subdivision (b) of Section 1516 shall deliver a duplicate certificate to the Controller or shall register the securities in uncertificated
 form in the name of the Controller. Upon delivering a duplicate certificate or providing evidence of registration of the securities in uncertificated form to the Controller, the holder, any transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of the holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate or registering the uncertificated securities, shall be relieved from all liability of every kind to any person including, but not limited to, any person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the Controller for any losses or damages resulting to that person by the issuance and delivery to the Controller of the duplicate certificate or the registration of the uncertificated securities to the Controller.

(e) (1) The holder of any digital financial asset that is subject to Section 1516.5 shall, no more than 30 days after the final date for filing the report required
 by this section, transfer the exact digital financial asset type, private keys, and amount, unliquidated, to the Controller’s cryptocurrency custodian or as the Controller by regulation may designate.

(2) If the holder possess only a partial private key to the digital financial asset or is otherwise unable to move the digital financial asset to the Controller, the holder shall maintain the digital financial asset until the additional keys required to transfer the digital financial asset become available to the holder or the holder is otherwise able to transfer the digital financial asset to the Controller.

(f) Payment of any intangible property to the Controller shall be made at the office of the Controller in Sacramento or at another location as the Controller by regulation may designate. Except as otherwise agreed by the Controller and the holder, tangible personal property
 shall be delivered to the Controller at the place where it is held.

(g) Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if the settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If the settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(h) Any person required to pay cash by electronic funds transfer who makes the payment by means other than an authorized electronic funds transfer shall be liable for a civil penalty of 2 percent of the amount of the payment that is due pursuant to this section, in addition to any other penalty provided by law. Penalties are due at the time of payment. If the Controller finds that a holder’s failure to make
 payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with the Controller’s procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the holder’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that holder shall be relieved of the penalties.

(i) An electronic funds transfer shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, a Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire), or by an international funds transfer. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction by the holder shall be paid by the state. Banking costs incurred by the state for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction may be paid by the holder originating the credit. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the holder and the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction. Banking costs charged to the
 holder and to the state for an international funds transfer may be charged to the holder.

(j) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, modem, computer, or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to credit or debit an account.

(2) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established by agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association or any similar organization, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and that authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between those
 banks or bank accounts.

(3) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the holder’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of payment.

(4) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the holder, through its own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting the holder’s bank account.
